Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 2
AUTO RENTAL CONTRACTS - COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVERS

6-1-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Collision damage waiver" means any contract or contractual provision, whether separate from or a part of a motor vehicle rental agreement, whereby the lessor agrees, for a charge, to waive any and all claims against the lessee for any damages to the rental motor vehicle during the term of the rental agreement.

"Lessee" means any person or organization obtaining the use of a rental motor vehicle from a lessor under the terms of a rental agreement.

"Lessor" means any person or organization in the business of providing rental motor vehicles to the public.

"Private passenger type automobile or vehicle" means a motor vehicle of the private passenger or station wagon type, including passenger vans and minivans that are primarily for the transport of persons.

"Rental agreement" means a written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of a rental motor vehicle by a lessee for a period of less than one hundred eighty days.

"Rental motor vehicle" means a private passenger type automobile or vehicle which, upon execution of a rental agreement, is made available to a lessee for its use.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 361, § 1, effective January 1, 1990.

6-1-202. Prohibited act.

No lessor engaged in renting motor vehicles may sell to any lessee renting a motor vehicle in this state a collision damage waiver as part of the rental contract unless the lessor first gives the lessee written disclosure, as provided in section 6-1-203, of the terms and provisions of such waiver.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 361, § 1, effective January 1, 1990.

6-1-203. Collision damage waiver form - requirements - failure to comply.

Any collision damage waiver form shall conform to the following requirements:

It shall be understandable and written in simple and readable plain language;

The terms of such collision damage waiver, including, but not limited to, any conditions or exclusions applicable to the collision damage waiver, shall be prominently displayed;

All restrictions, conditions, or provisions in, or endorsed on, the collision damage waiver shall be printed in type at least as large as brevier or ten-point type;

The collision damage waiver shall include a statement of the total charge for the anticipated rental period or the anticipated total daily charge; and

The agreement containing the collision damage waiver shall display the following notice on the face of the agreement, set apart and in bold-faced type, and in type at least as large as ten-point type:

The failure by a lessor to comply with any provision of this section is a deceptive trade practice under the provisions of this article.

NOTICE: THIS CONTRACT OFFERS, FOR AN ADDITIONAL CHARGE, A COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER TO COVER YOUR RESPONSIBILITY FOR DAMAGE TO THE VEHICLE. YOU ARE ADVISED NOT TO SIGN THIS WAIVER IF YOU HAVE RENTAL VEHICLE COLLISION COVERAGE PROVIDED BY CERTAIN GOLD OR PLATINUM CREDIT CARDS OR COLLISION INSURANCE ON YOUR OWN VEHICLE. BEFORE DECIDING WHETHER TO PURCHASE THE COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER, YOU MAY WISH TO DETERMINE WHETHER YOUR OWN VEHICLE INSURANCE AFFORDS YOU COVERAGE FOR DAMAGE TO THE RENTAL VEHICLE AND THE AMOUNT OF THE DEDUCTIBLE UNDER YOUR OWN INSURANCE COVERAGE. THE PURCHASE OF THIS COLLISION DAMAGE WAIVER IS NOT MANDATORY AND MAY BE WAIVED.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 362, § 1, effective January 1, 1990.

6-1-204. Prohibited exclusion.

No collision damage waiver subject to this part 2 shall contain an exclusion from the waiver for damages caused by the ordinary negligence of the lessee. Any such exclusion in violation of this section will be void and is a deceptive trade practice under this article. This section shall not be deemed to prohibit an exclusion from the waiver for damages caused by the lessee by:

Willful and wanton conduct or misconduct;

Intoxication by alcohol or use of controlled substances as defined in section 42-4-1301, C.R.S.;

Participation in a speed contest;

Carrying persons or property for hire, or pushing or towing anything;

Use of the vehicle while committing a misdemeanor or felony or other criminal act;

Use of the vehicle by an unauthorized driver, which includes any person not specifically authorized by the rental agreement;

Supplying information which is false concerning the rental transaction with intent to defraud the lessor;

Use of the vehicle outside the continental United States, unless specifically authorized by the rental agreement; and

Any instance whereby, during the rental of such rental motor vehicle, the speedometer or odometer is tampered with or disconnected.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 362, § 1, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 2544, § 15, effective January 1, 1995.

6-1-205. Information to be disclosed in advertisements for rental agreements for rental motor vehicles.

In any advertisement to the public for a rental agreement for a rental motor vehicle that includes a rental rate, the lessor shall prominently disclose on the face of any such advertisement the daily charge of any collision damage waiver offered, a statement informing a prospective lessee that he or she should review his or her own automobile insurance coverage to determine if such coverage applies to the use of a rental motor vehicle, and a statement that a prospective lessee may also wish to determine whether his or her credit card or travel and entertainment card provides collision damage coverage for use of a rental motor vehicle or other such privilege of membership.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 363, § 1, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 427, § 1, effective August 7.

6-1-206. Additional mandatory charges - required disclosures - definitions.

If a motor vehicle rental company imposes additional mandatory charges, the rental company shall:

Provide a good-faith estimate of the total charges for the entire rental, including all additional mandatory charges, whenever a quote is provided to a potential customer. The good-faith estimate may exclude mileage charges and charges for optional items that cannot be determined prior to completing a rental reservation based on the information provided by the potential customer.

Disclose in the rental contract provided to the renter the total charges for the entire rental, including all additional mandatory charges. Total charges for the entire rental do not include any charges that cannot be determined at the time the rental commences.

As used in this section:

"Additional mandatory charge" means any separately stated charges that a motor vehicle rental company requires a renter to pay that specifically relate to the operation of a rental vehicle. "Additional mandatory charge" includes, but is not limited to, a customer facility charge, airport concession recovery fee, road safety program fee, vehicle license recovery fee, or any government imposed taxes or fees.

"Motor vehicle" has the meaning set forth in section 44-20-102.

"Motor vehicle rental company" has the meaning set forth in section 10-1-102.

"Quote" means an estimated cost of rental provided by a motor vehicle rental company to a potential customer based on information provided by the customer, including potential dates of rental, location, or class of vehicle.

"Vehicle license recovery fee" means a charge to recover costs incurred by a motor vehicle rental company to license, title, register, plate, or inspect a rental vehicle.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-100), ch. 36, p. 392, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3462, § 2, effective August 2.

6-1-207. Adaptive equipment in rental motor vehicles - requirements - failure to comply - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12182 (a), states that "[n]o individual shall be discriminated against on the basis of disability in the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations of any place of public accommodation";

For the purposes of 42 U.S.C. sec. 12182 (a), discrimination includes "a failure to make reasonable modifications in policies, practices, or procedures, when such modifications are necessary to afford such goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to individuals with disabilities," unless the accommodation would work a fundamental alteration of those services and facilities;

The United States department of justice has found at least one rental car agency to be a public accommodation under the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12182 (a);

Certain adaptive equipment can be necessary for persons with a disability to drive an automobile; and

The provision of such adaptative equipment is reasonable and not a fundamental alteration of the services provided by a rental car agency.

Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section to prevent discrimination against persons with a disability by requiring that such persons have the ability to make online reservations for automobiles with adaptive equipment with rental car agencies that rent at least some motor vehicles with a gross weight of less than four thousand pounds.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adaptive equipment" means hand controls, left foot accelerators, spinner knobs, and pedal extenders.

"Lessee" means any person or organization obtaining, or attempting to obtain, the use of a rental motor vehicle from a lessor under the terms of a rental agreement.

"Lessor" means any person or organization in the business of providing rental motor vehicles of which some have a gross weight of less than four thousand pounds to the public, excluding a person or organization that is in the business of operating an online platform to connect third-party vehicle owners with third-party vehicle drivers to enable peer-to-peer car sharing, as defined in section 6-1-1202 (2), within Colorado.

"Person with a disability" means a person who is considered to have a disability, as that term is defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 12102.

"Remote location" means a location of the lessor's business that is more than a two hour drive from the Denver International Airport.

"Small business" means a lessor that owns no more than fifty motor vehicles.

Lessors shall provide an option for lessees to request the installation of adaptive equipment while making rental motor vehicle reservations on the lessor's website and during in-person reservations.

Lessors shall conspicuously incorporate into any reservation or reservation confirmation that includes a request for adaptive equipment:

A list of the adaptive equipment requested by the lessee;

Acknowledgment by the lessor that it will provide the adaptive equipment requested by the lessee; and

The date and time that the lessor will provide the lessee with a rental motor vehicle with adaptive equipment installed and ready for use.

A lessor must fulfill a reservation made by a lessee for the provision of a motor vehicle with adaptive equipment within forty-eight hours of the lessor receiving the reservation, unless the lessee requests that the lessor provide the motor vehicle at the lessor's business location at the Denver International Airport or at a remote location of the lessor's business.

A lessor must fulfill a reservation made by a lessee for the provision of a motor vehicle with adaptive equipment at the lessor's business location at the Denver International Airport within eight working hours after the lessor receives the reservation and an employee trained in the installation of adaptive equipment is on duty at the lessor's business location at the Denver International Airport.

A lessor must fulfill a reservation by a lessee for the provision of a motor vehicle with adaptive equipment at a remote location of the lessor's business within seventy-two hours of the lessor receiving the reservation.

The requirements of this subsection (5) do not apply in the case of an occurrence of an event beyond the lessor's reasonable control, including severe weather, acts of God, or acts of terrorism.

A lessee who is subject to a violation of this section by a small business occurring on or afer July 1, 2026, or by a lessor that is not a small business occurring on or after July 1, 2025, may bring a civil suit in a court of competent jurisdiction and is entitled to any of the following remedies:

A statutory fine of two thousand five hundred dollars, payable to each plaintiff for each violation;

The recovery of actual monetary damages;

An award of attorney fees and costs to a lessee who prevails under this section (5);

A court order requiring compliance with the applicable provisions of this section; and

Any other equitable relief deemed appropriate by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Nothing in this section limits the rights of persons with a disability provided under state or federal law related to discrimination.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1253), ch. 329, p. 2316, § 1, effective August 10.